North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
PART 2. PROCEDURE FOR SALE.
§ 45-21.21. Postponement of sale; notice of cancellation.

Any person exercising a power of sale may postpone the sale to a day certain not later than 90 days, exclusive of Sunday, after the original date for the sale -

When there are no bidders, or

When, in his judgment, the number of prospective bidders at the sale is substantially decreased by inclement weather or by any casualty, or

When there are so many other sales advertised to be held at the same time and place as to make it inexpedient and impracticable, in his judgment, to hold the sale on that day, or

When he is unable to hold the sale because of illness or for other good reason, or

When other good cause exists.

The person exercising a power of sale may postpone the sale more than once whenever any of the above conditions are met, so long as the sale is held not later than 90 days after the original date for the sale.

Upon postponement of a sale, the person exercising the power of sale shall personally, or through his agent or attorney -

At the time and place advertised for the sale, publicly announce the postponement thereof;

On the same day, attach to or enter on the original notice of sale or a copy thereof, posted at the courthouse door, as provided by

G.S. 45-21.17

, a notice of the postponement; and

Give written or oral notice of postponement to each party entitled to notice of sale under

G.S. 45-21.17

.

The posted notice of postponement shall -

State that the sale is postponed,

State the hour and date to which the sale is postponed,

State the reason for the postponement, and

Be signed by the person authorized to hold the sale, or by his agent or attorney.

If a sale is not held at the time fixed therefor and is not postponed as provided by this section, or if a postponed sale is not held at the time fixed therefor or within 90 days of the date originally fixed for the sale, then prior to such sale taking place the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.16

need not be complied with but the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.16

A, 45-21.17, and 45-21.17A shall be again complied with, or if on appeal, the appellate court orders the sale to be held, as to such sale so authorized the provisions of G.S. 45-21.16 need not be complied with again but those of G.S. 45-21.16A, 45-21.17, and 45-21.17A shall be.

A sale may be postponed more than once provided the final postponed sale date is not later than 90 days, exclusive of Sunday and legal holidays when the courthouse is closed for transactions, after the original date for the sale.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-243, s. 26(a), effective November 6, 2019.

If it is determined that the sale cannot be held in accordance with this section or is postponed pursuant to this section, then the person exercising the power of sale shall, immediately upon determining that the sale will not occur and prior to the scheduled time of the sale, deliver a written notice to the Clerk of Superior Court that is to include all of the following:

The case number assigned by the Clerk.

The mortgagor(s) and record owner(s) name(s).

The United States Postal Service address of the property or, if no address has been assigned, a brief description of the location of the property.

The originally scheduled date and time for the sale.

A statement that the foreclosure sale has been withdrawn, rescheduled for a specific date and time, or postponed with no date yet set, as appropriate.

If the notice required by subsection (g) of this section is not received by the Clerk prior to the scheduled time of the sale, then the person exercising the power of sale shall personally, or through his or her agent or attorney, do all of the following:

At the time and place advertised for the sale, publicly announce the cancellation thereof;

On the same day, attach to or enter on the original notice of sale or a copy thereof, posted at the courthouse door, as provided by

G.S. 45-21.17

, a notice of the cancellation;

Give written or oral notice of cancellation to each party entitled to notice of sale under

G.S. 45-21.17

; and

Hand-deliver the written notice required under subdivision (2) of this subsection to the Clerk's office.

So that the notice required by subsection (g) of this section may be delivered in the time frame required therein, the Clerk's office shall, upon request, provide to the person exercising the power of sale an e-mail address and/or fax telephone number to use for delivery of said notices.

Should the Clerk's office be unexpectedly closed on the day of the sale, the requirements of this subsection shall be delayed until the next day the Clerk's office is open for transactions.

All notices of a scheduled foreclosure sale, withdrawal of a scheduled sale, or postponement of a scheduled sale shall, on the day of receipt by the Clerk, be posted by the person exercising the power of sale in the location at the county courthouse normally used for the posting of public notices. If a scheduled sale has been withdrawn, that notice shall remain in that location for no less than 30 days. If the sale has been postponed, that notice shall remain in that location until it is replaced by a notice of a rescheduled sale or of a withdrawn sale.

The delivery of notices required by this section in no way removes any responsibility of any party to file documents with the Clerk as required elsewhere by law.

A clerk of superior court may report habitual noncompliance with this subsection to the Administrative Office of the Courts.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1975, c. 492, ss. 4-6; 1983, c. 335, s. 2; 1989, c. 257; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 777, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 12; 1995, c. 509, s. 25; 2003-337, s. 3; 2018-40, s. 11.1; 2018-145, s. 16; 2019-243, s. 26(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2018-40, s. 11.1, which amended this section, is located in Part XI of Session Laws 2018-40.
Section 11.2 of that act provides, "This section becomes effective July 1, 2018, and applies to foreclosure sales noticed on or after that date."
The reference to "This section" in Section 11.2 appears to have been in error and "This Part" was apparently the intended wording.
Section 15 of the act provides that except as otherwise provided, the act is effective when it becomes law.

Session Laws 2018-40, s. 14, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2018-40, s. 11.1, in the section heading, added "notice of cancellation"; and added subsections (f) through (m). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Session Laws 2018-145, s. 16, effective December 27, 2018, in subsections (h) and (i), substituted "subsection (g)" for "subsection (b)" preceding "of this section"; and in subsection (i), substituted "notice" for "notices" preceding "required by."

Session Laws 2019-243, s. 26(a), effective November 6, 2019, deleted subsection (f), which read: "A sale shall begin at the time designated in the notice of sale or as soon thereafter as practicable, but not later than one hour after the time fixed therefor unless it is delayed by other sales held at the same place. The sale shall be held between the hours of 10:00 A.M. and 4:00 P.M. on any day on which the Clerk's office is normally open for transactions."

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

For survey of 1981 property law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1420 (1982).

§ 45-21.22. Procedure upon dissolution of order restraining or enjoining sale, or upon debtor's bankruptcy before completion of sale.

When, before the date fixed for a sale, a judge dissolves an order restraining or enjoining the sale, he may, if the required notice of sale has been given, provide by order that the sale shall be held without additional notice at the time and place originally fixed therefor, or he may, in his discretion, make an order with respect thereto as provided in subsection (b).

When, after the date fixed for a sale, a judge dissolves an order restraining or enjoining the sale, he shall by order fix the time and place for the sale to be held upon notice to be given in such manner and for such length of time as he deems advisable.

When, after the entry of any authorization or order by the clerk of superior court pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.16

and before the expiration of the 10-day upset bid period, the foreclosure sale is stayed pursuant to 11 U.S.C. § 105 or 362, and thereafter the stay is lifted, terminated, or dissolved, the trustee or mortgagee shall not be required to comply with the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.16

, but shall advertise and hold the sale in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 45-21.16A, 45-21.17, and 45-21.17A.

In the event that completion of the foreclosure sale is stayed pursuant to 11 U.S.C. § 105 or 362, before the expiration of the 10-day upset bid period:

The clerk of superior court who received a deposit from an upset bidder shall release any deposits held on behalf of the upset bidder to the upset bidder upon receipt of a certified copy of an order or notice from the bankruptcy court indicating that the debtor has filed a bankruptcy petition; or

The trustee or mortgagee who received a cash deposit from the high bidder at the foreclosure sale, upon notification of the bankruptcy stay, shall release any deposits held on behalf of the high bidder to the high bidder.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 13; 2011-204, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-204, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, in the section catchline, substituted "or upon debtor's bankruptcy before completion of sale" for "or upon lifting of automatic bankruptcy stay"; in subsection (c), substituted "foreclosure sale is stayed pursuant to 11 U.S.C.
§
105 or 362" for "foreclosure is stayed by the debtor filing a bankruptcy petition" and inserted "terminated, or dissolved"; and added subsection (d).

§ 45-21.23. Time of sale.

A sale shall begin at the time designated in the notice of sale or as soon thereafter as practicable, but not later than one hour after the time fixed therefor unless it is delayed by other sales held at the same place. The sale shall be held between the hours of 10:00 A.M. and 4:00 P.M. on any day when the clerk's office is normally open for transactions.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 14; 2003-337, s. 4; 2019-243, s. 26(b).)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2019-243, s. 26(b), effective November 6, 2019, substituted "when the clerk's office is normally open for transactions" for "other than Sunday or a legal holiday when the courthouse is closed for transactions" in the second sentence.

§ 45-21.24. Continuance of uncompleted sale.

A sale commenced but not completed within the time allowed by

G.S. 45-21.23

shall be continued by the person holding the sale to a designated time between 10:00 o'clock A.M. and 4:00 o'clock P.M. the next following day, other than Sunday or a legal holiday when the courthouse is closed for transactions. In case such continuance becomes necessary, the person holding the sale shall publicly announce the time to which the sale is continued.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 15; 2003-337, s. 5.)

§ 45-21.25: Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

The person exercising a power of sale of real property, shall, within five days after the date of the sale, file a report thereof with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the sale was had.

The report shall be signed by the person authorized to hold the sale, or by his agent or attorney, and shall show -

The authority under which the person making the sale acted;

The name of the mortgagor or grantor;

The name of the mortgagee or trustee;

The date, time and place of the sale;

A reference to the book and page in the office of the register of deeds, where the instrument is recorded or, if not recorded, a description of the property sold, sufficient to identify it, and, if sold in parts, a description of each part so sold;

The name or names of the person or persons to whom the property was sold;

The price at which the property, or each part thereof, was sold, and that such price was the highest bid therefor;

The name of the person making the report; and

The date of the report.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1951, c. 252, s. 2.)

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.27. Upset bid on real property; compliance bonds.

An upset bid is an advanced, increased, or raised bid whereby any person offers to purchase real property theretofore sold, for an amount exceeding the reported sale price or last upset bid by a minimum of five percent (5%) thereof, but in any event with a minimum increase of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, an upset bid shall be made by delivering to the clerk of superior court, with whom the report of sale or last notice of upset bid was filed, a deposit in cash or by certified check or cashier's check satisfactory to the clerk in an amount greater than or equal to five percent (5%) of the amount of the upset bid but in no event less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). The deposit required by this section shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court, with whom the report of the sale or the last notice of upset bid was filed by the close of normal business hours on the tenth day after the filing of the report of the sale or the last notice of upset bid, and if the tenth day shall fall upon a Sunday or legal holiday when the courthouse is closed for transactions, or upon a day in which the office of the clerk is not open for the regular dispatch of its business, the deposit may be made and the notice of upset bid filed on the day following when said office is open for the regular dispatch of its business. Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.30

, there shall be no resales; rather, there may be successive upset bids each of which shall be followed by a period of 10 days for a further upset bid. When an upset bid is not filed following a sale, resale, or prior upset bid within the time specified, the rights of the parties to the sale or resale become fixed.

The clerk of the superior court may require an upset bidder or the highest bidder at a resale held pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.30

also to deposit with the clerk a cash bond, or, in lieu thereof at the option of the bidder, a surety bond, approved by the clerk. The compliance bond shall be in such amount as the clerk deems adequate, but in no case greater than the amount of the bid of the person being required to furnish the bond, less the amount of any required deposit. The compliance bond shall be payable to the State of North Carolina for the use of the parties in interest and shall be conditioned on the principal obligor's compliance with the bid.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 16.

(e)
At the same time that an upset bid on real property is submitted to the court as provided for in subsection (a) above, together with a compliance bond if one is required, the upset bidder shall simultaneously file with the clerk a notice of upset bid. The notice of upset bid shall:

State the name, address, and telephone number of the upset bidder;

Specify the amount of the upset bid;

Provide that the sale shall remain open for a period of 10 days after the date on which the notice of upset bid is filed for the filing of additional upset bids as permitted by law; and

Be signed by the upset bidder or the attorney or the agent of the upset bidder.

(e1)
When an upset bid is made as provided in this section, the clerk shall notify the trustee or mortgagee who shall thereafter mail a written notice of upset bid by first-class mail to the last known address of the last prior bidder and the current record owner(s) of the property.

(f)
When an upset bid is made as provided in this section, the last prior bidder, regardless of how the bid was made, shall be released from any further obligation on account of the bid and any deposit or bond provided by him shall be released.

(g)
Any person offering to purchase real property by upset bid as permitted in this Article shall be subject to and bound by the terms of the original notice of sale except as modified by court order or the provisions of this Article.

(h)
The clerk of superior court shall make all such orders as may be just and necessary to safeguard the interests of all parties, and shall have the authority to fix and determine all necessary procedural details with respect to upset bids in all instances in which this Article fails to make definite provisions as to that procedure.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1963, c. 377; 1967, c. 979, s. 3; 1993, c. 305, s. 16; 2003-337, s. 6.)

Legal Periodicals.

- As to former G.S. 45-28, which was similar to

G.S. 45-21.27

to 45-21.29 and 45-21.30, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 15, 300 (1935).

For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.28: Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 17, effective October 1, 1993, and applicable to instruments recorded prior to, on, or after that date.

through (j) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 18.

(k)
Orders for possession of real property sold pursuant to this Article, in favor of the purchaser and against any party or parties in possession at the time of application therefor, may be issued by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property is sold if all of the following apply:

The property has been sold in the exercise of the power of sale contained in any mortgage, deed of trust, leasehold mortgage, leasehold deed of trust, or a power of sale authorized by any other statutory provisions.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 18.

(2a) The provisions of this Article have been complied with.

The sale has been consummated, and the purchase price has been paid.

The purchaser has acquired title to and is entitled to possession of the real property sold.

Ten days' notice has been given to the party or parties who remain in possession at the time application is made, or, in the case of residential property containing 15 or more rental units, 30 days' notice has been given to the party or parties who remain in possession at the time the application is made.

(5a) Repealed by Session Laws 2019-243, s. 26(c), effective November 6, 2019.

Application is made by petition to the clerk by the mortgagee, the trustee, the purchaser of the property, or any authorized representative of the mortgagee, trustee, or purchaser of the property.

(
l
)
An order for possession issued pursuant to G.S. 45-21.29(k) shall be directed to the sheriff and shall authorize the sheriff to remove all occupants and their personal property from the premises and to put the purchaser in possession, and shall be executed in accordance with the procedure for executing a writ or order for possession in a summary ejectment proceeding under

G.S. 42-36.2

. The purchaser shall have the same rights and remedies in connection with the execution of an order for possession and the disposition of personal property following execution as are provided to a landlord under North Carolina law, including Chapters 42 and 44A of the General Statutes.

(m)
When the real property sold is situated in more than one county, the provisions of subsection (
l
) of this section shall be complied with in each county in which any part of the property is situated.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1951, c. 252, s. 3; 1965, c. 299; 1967, c. 979, s. 3; 1975, c. 492, ss. 7-9; 1987, c. 627, s. 3; 1993, c. 305, s. 18; 2007-353, s. 4; 2015-178, s. 2(a); 2019-53, s. 1; 2019-243, s. 26(c).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2015-178, s. 6, provides, in part, that subdivision (k)(5a) is applicable to orders for possession entered on or after October 1, 2015.

Session Laws 2019-53, s. 3, made the rewriting of subdivision (k)(5a) of this section by Session Laws 2019-53, s. 1, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2007-353, s. 4, effective October 1, 2007, substituted "sold if all of the following apply" for "sold,
when" at the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (k); rewrote subdivision (k)(5); substituted "the sheriff" for "him" in the first sentence of subsection (
l
); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

Session Laws 2015-178, s. 2(a), effective October 1, 2015, added subdivision (k)(5a). For applicability, see editor's note.

Session Laws 2019-53, s. 1, rewrote subdivision (k)(5a), which formerly read: "If the property is single-family residential and occupied pursuant to a lease, written or oral, the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.33

A have been satisfied. Any occupant subject to the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.33

A must additionally receive notice as required by subdivision (5) of this subsection." For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Session Laws 2019-243, s. 26(c), effective November 6, 2019, deleted subdivision (k)(5a), which read: "If the property is covered by the federal Protecting Tenants at Foreclosure Act (PTFA), Pub. L. 111-22, Title VII, Sections 701 through 703, as amended, the provisions of PTFA have been satisfied."

Legal Periodicals.

- For survey of 1972 case law on notice requirements of the nonjudicial foreclosure sale, see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1110 (1973).

For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

§ 45-21.29A. No necessity for confirmation of sale.

No confirmation of sales or resales of real property made pursuant to this Article shall be required. If an upset bid is not filed following a sale, resale, or prior upset bid within the period specified in this Article, the rights of the parties to the sale or resale become fixed.

(1967, c. 979, s. 3; 1993, c. 305, s. 19.)

§ 45-21.30. Failure of bidder to make cash deposit or to comply with bid; resale.

If the terms of a sale of real property require the highest bidder to make a cash deposit at the sale, and he fails to make such required deposit, the person holding the sale shall at the same time and place again offer the property for sale.

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

When the highest bidder at a sale or resale or any upset bidder fails to comply with his bid upon tender to him of a deed for the real property or after a bona fide attempt to tender such a deed, the clerk of superior court may, upon motion, enter an order authorizing a resale of the real property. The procedure for such resale shall be the same in every respect as is provided by this Article in the case of an original sale of real property except that the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.16

are not applicable to the resale.

A defaulting bidder at any sale or resale or any defaulting upset bidder is liable on his bid, and in case a resale is had because of such default, he shall remain liable to the extent that the final sale price is less than his bid plus all the costs of the resale. Any deposit or compliance bond made by the defaulting bidder shall secure payment of the amount, if any, for which the defaulting bidder remains liable under this section.

Nothing in this section deprives any person of any other remedy against the defaulting bidder.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1975, c. 492, s. 10; 1977, c. 359, s. 15; 1993, c. 305, s. 20.)

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

§ 45-21.31. Disposition of proceeds of sale; payment of surplus to clerk.

The proceeds of any sale shall be applied by the person making the sale, in the following order, to the payment of -

Costs and expenses of the sale, including the trustee's commission, if any, and a reasonable auctioneer's fee if such expense has been incurred, and reasonable counsel fees for an attorney serving as a trustee if allowed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section;

Taxes due and unpaid on the property sold, as provided by

G.S. 105-385

, unless the notice of sale provided that the property be sold subject to taxes thereon and the property was so sold;

Special assessments, or any installments thereof, against the property sold, which are due and unpaid, as provided by

G.S. 105-385

, unless the notice of sale provided that the property be sold subject to special assessments thereon and the property was so sold;

The obligation secured by the mortgage, deed of trust or conditional sale contract.

(a1)
The clerk of the superior court of the county where the sale was had may exercise discretion to allow reasonable counsel fees to an attorney serving as a trustee (in addition to the compensation allowed to the attorney as a trustee) where the attorney, on behalf of the trustee, renders professional services as an attorney that are different from the services normally performed by a trustee and of a type which would reasonably justify the retention of legal counsel by a trustee who is not licensed to practice law. Counsel fees are presumed reasonable if in compliance with

G.S. 6-21.2(1)

and (2). Nothing in this section, however, shall preclude the clerk of superior court from deeming a higher fee reasonable.

Any surplus remaining after the application of the proceeds of the sale as set out in subsection (a) shall be paid to the person or persons entitled thereto, if the person who made the sale knows who is entitled thereto. Otherwise, the surplus shall be paid to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the sale was had -

In all cases when the owner of the property sold is dead and there is no qualified and acting personal representative of his estate, and

In all cases when he is unable to locate the persons entitled thereto, and

In all cases when the mortgagee, trustee or vendor is, for any cause, in doubt as to who is entitled to such surplus money, and

In all cases when adverse claims thereto are asserted.

Such payment to the clerk discharges the mortgagee, trustee or vendor from liability to the extent of the amount so paid.

The clerk shall receive such money from the mortgagee, trustee or vendor and shall execute a receipt therefor.

The clerk is liable on his official bond for the safekeeping of money so received until it is paid to the party or parties entitled thereto, or until it is paid out under the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1951, c. 252, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1981, c. 682, s. 10; 2013-104, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-104, s. 1, effective June 12, 2013, added "and reasonable counsel fees for an attorney serving as a trustee if allowed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section" at the end of
subdivision (a)(1); and added subsection (a1).

§ 45-21.32. Special proceeding to determine ownership of surplus.

A special proceeding may be instituted before the clerk of the superior court by any person claiming any money, or part thereof, paid into the clerk's office under

G.S. 45-21.31

, to determine who is entitled thereto.

All other persons who have filed with the clerk notice of their claim to the money or any part thereof, or who, as far as the petitioner or petitioners know, assert any claim to the money or any part thereof, shall be made defendants in the proceeding.

If any answer is filed raising issues of fact as to the ownership of the money, the proceeding shall be transferred to the civil issue docket of the superior court for trial. When a proceeding is so transferred, the clerk may require any party to the proceeding who asserts a claim to the fund by petition or answer to furnish a bond for costs in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200.00) or otherwise comply with the provisions of

G.S. 1-109

.

The court may, in its discretion, allow a reasonable attorney's fee for any attorney appearing in behalf of the party or parties who prevail, to be paid out of the funds in controversy, and shall tax all costs against the losing party or parties who asserted a claim to the fund by petition or answer.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- As to special proceedings generally, see

G.S. 1-393

et seq.

§ 45-21.33. Final report of sale of real property.

A person who holds a sale of real property pursuant to a power of sale shall file with the clerk of the superior court of the county where the sale is held a final report and account of his receipts and disbursements within 30 days after the receipt of the proceeds of such sale. Such report shall show whether the property was sold as a whole or in parts and whether all of the property was sold. The report shall also show whether all or only a part of the obligation was satisfied with respect to which the power of sale of property was exercised.

The clerk shall audit the account and record it.

The person who holds the sale shall also file with the clerk -

A copy of the notices of sale and resale, if any, which were posted, and

A copy of the notices of sale and resale, if any, which were published in a newspaper, together with an affidavit of publication thereof, if the notices were so published;

Proof as required by the clerk, which may be by affidavit, that notices of hearing, sale and resale were served upon all parties entitled thereto under

G.S. 45-21.16

, 45-21.17, 45-21.17A, and 45-21.30. In the absence of an affidavit to the contrary filed with the clerk, an affidavit by the person holding the sale that the notice of sale was posted in the area designated by the clerk of superior court for posting public notices in the county or counties in which the property is situated 20 days prior to the sale shall be proof of compliance with the requirements of G.S. 45-21.17(1)a.

The clerk's fee for auditing and recording the final account is a part of the expenses of the sale, and the person holding the sale shall pay the clerk's fee as part of such expenses.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1975, c. 492, s. 11; 1983, c. 799; 1993, c. 305, s. 21; 1995, c. 509, s. 26.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 1975, c. 492, which amended this section, provides in s. 14: "The words clerk of court as used in this act shall be deemed to include assistant clerk of court."

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

§ 45-21.33A: Repealed by Session Laws 2019-53, s. 2, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.

(2015-178, s. 2(b); repealed by 2019-53, s. 2, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.)

Editor's Note.

- Former

G.S. 45-21.33

A pertained to the effect of foreclosure on a preexisting tenancy.

Session Laws 2019-53, s. 3, made the repeal of this section by Session Laws 2019-53, s. 2,
effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to petitions filed on or after that date.

§ 45-21.20. Satisfaction of debt after publishing or posting notice, but before completion of sale.

§ 45-21.26. Preliminary report of sale of real property.

§ 45-21.29. Orders for possession.